Utah statutes.
4-35-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Committee" means the Decision and Action Committee created by and established under this chapter.

(2)  "Department" means the Department of Agriculture and Food.

(3)  "Insect" means, but is not limited to, grasshopper, range caterpillar, mormon cricket, apple maggot, cherry fruit fly, plum curculio, and cereal leaf beetle.

